Utah statutes.
75-3-311.   Informal appointment unavailable in certain cases.
If an application for informal appointment indicates the existence of a
possible unrevoked testamentary instrument which may relate to property
subject to the laws of this state, and which is not filed for probate in this
court, the registrar shall decline the application.
